Mississippi, session 2026, HB132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Each resident of a nursing facility, assisted living facility, personal care home or adult foster care facility licensed under Chapter 11, Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972, who is sixty (60) years of age or older shall obtain a preneed contract meeting the requirements of the Preneed Cemetery and Funeral Registration Act (Sections 75-63-51 through 75-63-81) that provides services, merchandise or both in connection with the final disposition of the resident's body after his or her death, within six (6) months after being admitted to the facility.  If a resident does not obtain a preneed contract within the time required by this section, the facility must purchase a preneed contract for the resident and add the cost of purchasing the preneed contract to the regular charges to the resident by the facility. (2)  Any resident of a facility described in subsection (1) of this section on July 1, 2026, who is sixty (60) years of age or older, who was admitted to the facility before July 1, 2026, and who does not have a preneed contract meeting the requirements of this section must obtain a preneed contract not later than December 31, 2026, or the facility shall purchase a preneed contract for the resident as provided in this section. (3)  A nursing facility, assisted living facility, personal care home or adult foster care facility may not refuse to admit a person to the facility because the person does not have a preneed contract before becoming a resident of the facility and may not take any adverse action against a resident of the facility if the resident does not obtain a preneed contract while a resident of the facility.  The State Department of Health shall enforce the provisions of this subsection. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.